District of Columbia statutes.
50-902

Purpose.

The DMV is charged with helping to improve the District of Columbia’s economic competitiveness and quality of life by fostering the safe operation of motor vehicles on District streets in accordance with applicable laws and regulations.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1823, 45 DCR 7193

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-152.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of chapter, see note to § 50-901.
For temporary (90-day) addition of Chapter 1A, see notes following § 50-901.

Editor's Notes

Application of D.C. Law 12-175: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 50-901.